trunk/incubator/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>

    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="ut"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>

    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>

    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="tog__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bold__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cirk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lens</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lers</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lernes</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ka/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tten</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttene</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttens</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttes</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttenes</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spi/l__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llet</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llene</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ls</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llets</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ls</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llenes</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nø/d__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dden</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dder</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dderne</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddens</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dders</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddernes</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="og"><i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bankfuldmægtig"><i>bankfuldmægtig</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buffetvogn"><i>buffetvogn</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="færingebåd"><i>færingebåd</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frossenpind"><i>frossenpind</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovedbund"><i>hovedbund</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="læredreng"><i>læredreng</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="øjenkrog"><i>øjenkrog</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ritråd"><i>ritråd</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skjortenål"><i>skjortenål</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søndenvind"><i>søndenvind</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="surdej"><i>surdej</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="travhest"><i>travhest</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antikvarboghand"><i>antikvarboghand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artik"><i>artik</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batchkørs"><i>batchkørs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bimp"><i>bimp</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blomsterhand"><i>blomsterhand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirk"><i>cirk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dataoverførs"><i>dataoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forholdsreg"><i>forholdsreg</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvirv"><i>hvirv</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kørs"><i>kørs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pengeoverførs"><i>pengeoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="variab"><i>variab</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angoraka"><i>angoraka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blåha"><i>blåha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bruskha"><i>bruskha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dameha"><i>dameha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hanka"><i>hanka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="majka"><i>majka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="misseka"><i>misseka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paddeha"><i>paddeha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørha"><i>rørha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skørha"><i>skørha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svovlha"><i>svovlha</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vildka"><i>vildka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="betelnø"><i>betelnø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blærenø"><i>blærenø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cashewnø"><i>cashewnø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flodbre"><i>flodbre</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hasselnø"><i>hasselnø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jordnø"><i>jordnø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolanø"><i>kolanø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muskatnø"><i>muskatnø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostema"><i>ostema</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paranø"><i>paranø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pekannø"><i>pekannø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valnø"><i>valnø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avlsfø"><i>avlsfø</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brilleste"><i>brilleste</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dartspi"><i>dartspi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstemporalspi"><i>ekstemporalspi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flipperspi"><i>flipperspi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hasardspi"><i>hasardspi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koglespi"><i>koglespi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lystspi"><i>lystspi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pointta"><i>pointta</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="situationsspi"><i>situationsspi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svingningsta"><i>svingningsta</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beslutningsgrundlag"><i>beslutningsgrundlag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daggry"><i>daggry</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="essay"><i>essay</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="formalitetsspørgsmål"><i>formalitetsspørgsmål</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husdyrhold"><i>husdyrhold</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="livstegn"><i>livstegn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ørenhår"><i>ørenhår</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sækdyr"><i>sækdyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skriftsprog"><i>skriftsprog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statsbesøg"><i>statsbesøg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tigerspring"><i>tigerspring</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undervandsskær"><i>undervandsskær</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
